Massachusetts, session 194th, H4381.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11 of chapter 541 of the acts of 1947, as amended by section 1 of
chapter 301 of the acts of 2018, is hereby further amended by striking out the first sentence and
inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- A moderator shall be elected by the registered
voters of the town by ballot for a 3-year term and shall serve as the moderator of all town
meetings, except as otherwise provided by law, until their successor is qualified.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1